apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
 <pardef n="zebra__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>s</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


<pardef n="BBC__n">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="Mr__n">

      
                              <e>
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="DNA__n">

      
                              <e>
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

                              <e>
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

	 







<pardef n="Barcelona__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
</pardef>


 <pardef n="United_States__np">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="Mark__np">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

 <pardef n="Mary__np">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>







 <pardef n="one__num">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

 </pardef>

 

    <pardef n="two__num">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>hundred</l>
          <r><b/>hundred<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>thousand</l>
          <r><b/>thousand<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


    
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="million__num">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

 </pardef>


    <pardef n="twenty__num">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-one</l>
          <r>-one</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-two</l>
          <r>-two</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-three</l>
          <r>-three</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-four</l>
          <r>-four</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-five</l>
          <r>-five</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-six</l>
          <r>-six</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-seven</l>
          <r>-seven</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-eight</l>
          <r>-eight</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>-nine</l>
          <r>-nine</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>

    </pardef>








   

<pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="want__vbmod">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="will/__vbmod">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="c/an__vbmod">

                             <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                           <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ould</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

</pardef>

                        <e lm="TV"><i>TV</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="UN"><i>UN</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="Mr"><i>Mr</i><par n="Mr__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="Comm"><i>Comm</i><par n="Mr__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="euro"><i>euro</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="seed"><i>seed</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="squid"><i>squid</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="zebra"><i>zebra</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="cul-de-sac"><i>cul-de-sac</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="partridge"><i>partridge</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="ID"><i>ID</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="PC"><i>PC</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="pH"><i>pH</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="GDP"><i>GDP</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="BP"><i>BP</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="CD"><i>CD</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="Brussels"><i>Brussels</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Canary Islands"><i>Canary<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Axis"><i>Axis</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Channel Islands"><i>Channel<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Falkland Islands"><i>Falkland<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Fujairah"><i>Fujairah</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Latin America"><i>Latin<b/>America</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Marshall Islands"><i>Marshall<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="New Caledonia"><i>New<b/>Caledonia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Siam"><i>Siam</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="United Arab Emirates"><i>United<b/>Arab<b/>Emirates</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Austria"><i>Austria</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Baterich"><i>Baterich</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Christopher"><i>Christopher</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Dionisia"><i>Dionisia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Giles"><i>Giles</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="In&#xE8;s"><i>Inès</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Joel"><i>Joel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Margalida"><i>Margalida</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Nichol"><i>Nichol</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="Roger"><i>Roger</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="T&#xE0;nia"><i>Tània</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
                        <e lm="one"><i>one</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="a thousand"><i>a<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="a million"><i>a<b/>million</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="one hundred"><i>one<b/>hundred</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="one thousand"><i>one<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="million"><i>million</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="four"><i>four</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="two"><i>two</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="ten"><i>ten</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="fourteen"><i>fourteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="eighteen"><i>eighteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="thirty"><i>thirty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="forty"><i>forty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="fifty"><i>fifty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="sixty"><i>sixty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="eighty"><i>eighty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
                        <e lm="have to"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="want to"><i>want</i><par n="want__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="shall"><i>shall</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                        <e lm="would"><i>would</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                        <e lm="can"><i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
                        <e lm="must"><i>must</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                        <e lm="should"><i>should</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
                        <e lm="might"><i>might</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
